South Dakota, session 2026, HB1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 26-8A-3 be AMENDED:
26-8A-3. Any physician, dentist, doctor of osteopathy, chiropractor, optometrist,
emergency medical technician, paramedic, mental health professional or counselor,
podiatrist, psychologist, member of the clergy, religious healing practitioner, social
worker, hospital intern or resident, parole or court services officer, law enforcement
officer, teacher, school counselor, school official, nurse, licensed or registered child welfare
provider, employee or volunteer of a domestic abuse shelter, employee or volunteer of a
child advocacy organization or child welfare service provider, chemical dependency
counselor, coroner, dental hygienist, or any safety-sensitive position as defined in § 3-6C-
1, who has reasonable cause to suspect that a child under the age of eighteen has been
abused or neglected as defined in § 26-8A-2, shall report that information in accordance
with §§ 26-8A-6, 26-8A-7, and 26-8A-8. Any person who intentionally fails to make the
required report is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Any person who knows or has reason to suspect that a child has been abused or
neglected as defined in § 26-8A-2 may report that information as provided in § 26-8A-8.
Section 2. That § 26-8A-15 be AMENDED:
26-8A-15. The privilege of confidentiality set forth in §§ 19-2-3, 19-19-503, 19-
19-504, 19-19-505, 19-19-508.1, and 36-26-30 may not be claimed in any judicial
proceeding involving an alleged abused or neglected child or resulting from the giving or
causing the giving of a report concerning abuse or neglect of a child pursuant to §§ 26-
8A-3 to 26-8A-8, inclusive.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.